Massachusetts, session 194th, H4200.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the department of public
health shall establish a pilot program to allow for the monitored mental health care of clinically
appropriate patients using psychedelic materials as defined by the department of public health for
on-site administration by a multi-disciplinary care team in a supervised licensed mental health
clinic setting. The department shall issue pilot permits to no more than three licensed mental
health clinic facilities to participate in the pilot program for the purposes of establishing the best
and safest clinical practices for psychedelic mental health treatment programs in the
commonwealth and for the purposes of collecting patient outcomes data regarding the benefits of
psychedelic pharmacotherapy. Authorization shall be given to clinics licensed in mental health
services as defined by the department of public health. Eligible pilot program organizations must
exclusively focus operations and treatment on mental health and cannot be subsidiaries, affiliates
or members of cannabis industry organizations, psychedelic molecule development companies or
pharmaceutical companies.
of 2

The department shall promulgate the rules and regulations necessary for the operation of
a supervised psychedelic pilot in a clinical setting, including but not limited to, establishing a
process to apply for participation in the pilot. The regulations must include but not be limited to:
the definitions and standards for clinic participation; the process of initial patient assessment and
ongoing monitoring; the composition of the clinical staff and the role of a licensed physician to
oversee the program; the process of ensuring coordination and medical management of
psychiatric medications with prescribers outside of the participating outpatient clinical pilot; and,
the process of storage, dispensing and administration of psychedelics within the participating
pilot.
All pilot program participant organizations must track patient care outcomes data related
to the identification, diagnosis and psychedelic treatment of depression, anxiety, post-traumatic
stress disorder and substance use disorder. These data sets must be shared with the department to
assist in the refinement of best clinical protocols and final regulatory frameworks for the safe use
of psychedelic material in Massachusetts.
of 2